Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-510
Children eligible for assistance.

In order to be eligible for assistance, a child must be a bona fide resident of the State of Nebraska.

Laws 1935, Spec. Sess., c. 30, § 10, p. 184;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 43-510;

R.S.1943, § 43-510;

Laws 1951, c. 129, § 1, p. 548;

Laws 1969, c. 343, § 2, p. 1206.